Louisiana, session 2026, HB823.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 33-D of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 13:5381 through 5386, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 33-D. HOMELESS DIVERSION PILOT PROGRAM
§5381. Short title
This provisions of this Chapter are to create a pilot program in Orleans Parish
entitled the "Homeless Diversion Pilot Program".
§5382. Goals
The goals of the homeless diversion pilot program created in this Chapter
include all of the following:
(1) To reduce drug abuse and alcoholism and dependency among offenders.
(2) To reduce the alcohol and drug-related workload of the courts.
(3) To reduce criminal recidivism.
(4) To diagnose undiagnosed mental health problems and to assist in the care
and treatment of diagnosed mental health illnesses.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 823 ENROLLED
(5) To increase the personal, familial, and societal accountability of
offenders.
(6) To reduce prison overcrowding.
(7) To provide employment and job training for those experiencing
homelessness.
(8) To provide housing assistance for those experiencing homelessness in
partnership with state, local, and federal housing authorities and nonprofit
organizations.
(9) To provide counseling services as necessary.
§5383. Homeless diversion pilot program; Parish of Orleans; creation
A.(1) The district attorney for Orleans Parish shall create and administer a
pilot program for homeless defendants. The district attorney, at his discretion, may
choose to be the operator of the program using his own office personnel or may
choose a vendor as the operator of the program.
(2) The pilot program may be offered, at the discretion of the district
attorney, to a homeless defendant as part of a pretrial diversion program.
B. The terms of the pilot program shall be decided by the district attorney,
which shall have all of the following essential characteristics:
(1) The integration of health care, education, and housing assistance, as well
as employment, job training, disability compensation counseling, and other
rehabilitative services in the processing of cases in the criminal justice system.
(2) Early identification and prompt placement of eligible participants into the
program.
(3) The use of nonadversarial approaches involving prosecutors and defense
attorneys to promote public safety and protect the due process rights of program
participants.
(4) Access to continuum of alcohol, controlled substance, mental health,
suicide assessment, intervention, treatment and management, and other related
treatment and rehabilitative services.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 823 ENROLLED
(5) Careful monitoring of treatment and services provided to program
participants.
(6) A coordinated strategy to govern program responses to participant
compliance.
(7) Ongoing judicial interaction with program participants.
(8) Monitoring and evaluation of program goals and effectiveness.
(9) Continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective program
planning, implementation, and operations.
(10) Development of partnerships with public agencies and community
organizations, including but not limited to the Louisiana Works, the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development, and any other local, state or federal
agency, or organization that can provide assistance to participants.
§5384. Written policies and guidelines
The district attorney shall adopt written policies and guidelines for the
implementation of a probation program in accordance with this Chapter. The policies
and guidelines shall include provisions concerning the following:
(1) How to examine the defendant initially to determine if he is qualified for
enrollment.
(2) How to advise the defendant of the program if the court has reason to
believe the defendant may suffer from alcohol or drug addiction or mental health
problems or illnesses.
(3) What licensed treatment programs are certified by the court.
(4) How to assist a defendant in obtaining employment.
(5) What residential and housing opportunities exist.
§5385. Dismissal of certain criminal charges upon completion of homeless
diversion pilot probation program
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, as to any
person eligible for participation in the homeless diversion pilot program as provided
in this Chapter, when it appears that the best interests of the public and the defendant
will be served, the district attorney may defer proceedings and request that he be
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 823 ENROLLED
placed on probation upon such reasonable terms and conditions as may be required
by the court and the provisions of this Chapter.
B. Upon the defendant's violation of any of the terms or conditions of his
probation, the court may revoke his probation, enter an adjudication of guilt, and
impose sentence upon the person. The entering of the adjudication of guilt shall be
retroactive to the date the defendant pled guilty or was convicted pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section, but the imposition or execution of sentence shall not
be retroactive.
C. Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions of probation imposed in
accordance with this Section, the district attorney shall dismiss the proceedings
against him.
D. The dismissal of charges pursuant to this Section shall be without court
adjudication of guilt and shall not be deemed a conviction for purposes of
disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime, including
the additional penalties imposed for second or subsequent convictions pursuant to
R.S. 40:982. The dismissal of charges pursuant to this Section may occur only once
with respect to any person.
§5386. Report to the Louisiana Supreme Court
The Homeless Diversion Pilot Program shall develop a method of evaluation
to measure its effectiveness. This evaluation shall be compiled annually and
transmitted to the judicial administrator of the Louisiana Supreme Court.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.